Georgia, session 2025_26, SB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 12 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Emergency Communications Authority, is amended by revising Code Section 38-3-188,
relating to retention of funds by Department of Revenue and payments to local governments,
as follows:
- 1 -

LC 56 0343S
"38-3-188.
(a) The Department of Revenue shall retain and remit from the total amount of funds
collected by it from charges imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185
and pursuant to Code Section 46-5-134.2 an amount equal to 1 percent to the authority and
an amount equal to 0.75 40.75 percent of the total amount to the Peace Officers' Annuity
and Benefit Fund as further provided for in Code Section 47-17-63.
(b) Except for the amounts retained by the authority, Department of Revenue, Peace
Officers' Annuity and Benefit Fund, and service suppliers pursuant to Code Sections
38-3-186 and 46-5-134 and this Code section, the remainder of the charges remitted by
service suppliers shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to each local government on
a pro rata basis based on the remitted amounts attributable to each such local government
reported by service suppliers in the reports required by subsection (b) of Code Section
38-3-185. Such payments shall be made by the Department of Revenue to such local
governments not later than 30 days following the date charges must be remitted by service
suppliers to the Department of Revenue pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section
38-3-185. Under no circumstances shall such payments be, or be deemed to be, revenues
of the state and such payments shall not be subject to or available for appropriation by the
state for any purpose."
SECTION 2.
Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to emergency telephone number 9-1-1 system, is amended in Code Section 46-5-134,
relating to billing of subscribers, liability of subscriber for service charge, taxes on service,
establishment of Emergency Telephone System Fund, cost recovery fee, records, and use of
funds, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1)(A)(i) Unless exempt, the telephone subscriber of any telephone service shall
be billed for the monthly 9-1-1 charge, if any, imposed with respect to such telephone
- 2 -

LC 56 0343S
service by the service supplier. Beginning on July 1, 2025, such 9-1-1 charge shall
be $2.50 Such 9-1-1 charge shall be $1.50 per month per telephone service provided
to the telephone subscriber except as reduced pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection
(d) of this Code section.
(ii) In computing the amount due under this subsection, the number of 9-1-1 charges
a telephone subscriber shall be assessed shall not exceed the number of simultaneous
outbound calls that can be made from voice channels the service supplier has
activated and enabled. For telephone service that provides to multiple locations
shared simultaneous outbound voice channel capacity configured to and capable of
accessing a 9-1-1 system in different states, the monthly 9-1-1 charge shall be
assessed only for the portion of such shared voice channel capacity in this state as
identified by the service supplier's books and records. In determining the portion of
shared capacity in this state, a service supplier may rely on, among other factors, a
customer's certification of its allocation of capacity in this state, which may be based
on each end user location, the total number of end users, and the number of end users
at each end user location.
(B) All telephone services billed to federal, state, or local governments shall be exempt
from the 9-1-1 charge. Each service supplier shall, on behalf of the local government,
collect the 9-1-1 charge from those telephone subscribers to whom it provides
telephone service in the area served by the emergency 9-1-1 system. As part of its
normal billing process, the service supplier shall collect the 9-1-1 charge for each
month a telephone service is in service, and it shall list the 9-1-1 charge as a separate
entry on each bill. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require a service
supplier to list the 9-1-1 charge as a surcharge or separate entry on each bill. Service
suppliers that do not list the 9-1-1 charge as a separate entry on each bill shall remit the
9-1-1 charge for each telephone subscriber that pays the bill; provided, however, that
this information shall be maintained in a form auditors can access. If a service supplier
- 3 -

LC 56 0343S
receives a partial payment for a bill from a telephone subscriber, the service supplier
shall apply the payment against the amount the telephone subscriber owes the service
supplier first.
(C) This paragraph shall not apply to wireless service or prepaid wireless service or the
telephone subscribers or service suppliers of such services.
(2)(A) If the governing body of a local government operates or contracts for the
operation of a public safety answering point that is capable of providing or provides
automatic number identification of a wireless telecommunications connection and the
location of the base station or cell site which receives a 9-1-1 call from a wireless
telecommunications connection, the subscriber of a wireless telecommunications
connection whose place of primary use is within the geographic area that is served by
the local government or that would be served by the local government for the purpose
of such a public safety answering point may be billed for the monthly wireless
enhanced 9-1-1 charge, if any, imposed with respect to that connection by the wireless
service supplier. Beginning on July 1, 2025, such wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge shall
be $2.50 Such wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge shall be $1.50 per month per wireless
telecommunications connection provided to the telephone subscriber except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section.
(B) If the governing body of a local government operates or contracts for the operation
of an emergency 9-1-1 system which is capable of providing or provides automatic
number identification and automatic location identification of a wireless
telecommunications connection, the subscriber of a wireless telecommunications
connection whose place of primary use is within the geographic area that is served by
the local government or that would be served by the local government for the purpose
of such an emergency 9-1-1 system may be billed for the monthly wireless enhanced
9-1-1 charge, if any, imposed with respect to that connection by the wireless service
supplier. Such wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge may not exceed the amount of the
- 4 -

LC 56 0343S
monthly 9-1-1 charge imposed upon other telephone subscribers pursuant to
paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall be imposed on a monthly basis for each
wireless telecommunications connection provided to the telephone subscriber.
(C) All wireless telecommunications connections billed to federal, state, or local
100 governments shall be exempt from the wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge. Each wireless
101 service supplier shall, on behalf of the local government, collect the wireless enhanced
102 9-1-1 charge from those telephone subscribers whose place of primary use is within the
103 geographic area that is served by the local government or that would be served by the
104 local government for the purpose of such an emergency 9-1-1 system. As part of its
105 normal billing process, the wireless service supplier shall collect the wireless
106 enhanced 9-1-1 charge for each month a wireless telecommunications connection is in
107 service, and it may list the wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge as a separate entry on each
108 bill. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require a wireless service
109 supplier to list the 9-1-1 charge as a separate entry on each bill. Wireless service
110 suppliers that do not list the 9-1-1 charge as a separate entry on each bill shall remit the
111 9-1-1 charge for each telephone subscriber that pays the bill; provided, however, that
112 this information shall be maintained in a form auditors can access. If a wireless service
113 supplier receives partial payment for a bill from a telephone subscriber, the wireless
114 service supplier shall apply the payment against the amount the telephone subscriber
115 owes the wireless service supplier first.
116 (D) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the application of any 9-1-1 service charge with
117 respect to a mobile telecommunications service, as defined in 4 U.S.C. Section 124(7),
118 shall be governed by the provisions of Code Section 48-8-6.
119 (E) This paragraph shall not apply to prepaid wireless service or the telephone
120 subscribers or service suppliers of such service."
- 5 -

LC 56 0343S
121 SECTION 3.
122 Said part is further amended in Code Section 46-5-134.2, relating to prepaid wireless 9-1-1
123 charge, definitions, imposition of fee by localities, collection and remission of charges, and
124 distribution of funds, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
125 "(b)(1) Counties and municipalities that operate a 9-1-1 public safety answering point,
126 including counties and municipalities that operate multijurisdictional or regional 9-1-1
127 systems or have created a joint authority pursuant to Code Section 46-5-138, are
128 authorized to impose by ordinance or resolution a prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge in the
129 amount of $1.50 $2.50 per retail transaction. Imposition of the charge authorized by this
130 Code section by a county or municipality shall be contingent upon compliance with the
131 requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (j) of this Code section. Any charge imposed
132 by ordinance pursuant to this subsection prior to July 1, 2025, shall, beginning on
133 July 1, 2025, be in the amount of $2.50.
134 (2) Where a county or municipality that operates a 9-1-1 public safety answering point
135 fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (j) of this Code
136 section by December 31, 2011, on and after that date, the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge
137 authorized by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be imposed within the jurisdiction of
138 such counties and municipalities as a state fee for state purposes."
139 SECTION 4.
140 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 6 -